South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3531.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 23-47-80 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 23-47-80.  (A) It is unlawful for a person anonymously or otherwise to: (1) use any words or language of a profane, vulgar, lewd, lascivious, or indecent nature on an emergency 911 number with the intent to intimidate or harass a dispatcher; (2) contact the emergency 911 number, whether or not conversation ensues for the purpose of annoying or harassing the dispatcher or interfering with or disrupting emergency 911 service; (3) make contact with a 911 dispatcher and intentionally fail to hang up or disengage the connection for the purpose of interfering with or disrupting emergency service; (4) text 911 in such a volume to disrupt the emergency service; or (4)(5) contact the emergency 911 number and intentionally make a false report. (B) A person who violates the provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, must be imprisoned not more than six months or fined not more than two hundred dollars, or both. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----